Hawaii statutes.
§132-11 [OLD] REPEALED. L 1978, c
241, §2(12).

§132-11 Recorded order of county fire
chiefs as evidence. A duplicate original of every order made by each
county fire chief shall be filed in the fire chief's office and such duplicate
original shall be admissible as evidence in any prosecution for the violation
of any of its provisions. Unless an appeal has been instituted and is pending,
the provisions of any order shall be presumed to be reasonable and lawful and
to fix a reasonable and proper standard and requirement of safety from fire
loss. [L 1917, c 115, pt of §49; RL 1925, pt of §3463; RL 1935, pt of §6839; am
L 1939, c 239, §1(18); RL 1945, §8436; RL 1955, §184-13; HRS §132-13; am and
ren L 1978, c 241, §2(14); gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next